apertium-swe-nor.nor.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

! Nominal tags:
%<n%>
%<sg%>
%<pl%>
%<indef%>
%<def%>
%<adj%>
%<masc%>
%<fem%>
%<neu%>
%<prop%>

! Pronominal additions:
%<pron%>
%<subj%>
%<obj%>
%<px%> ! Possessive forms like hans, hennes
%<refl%>
%<qst%>

! Verb tags:
%<v%>
%<inf%>
%<pres%>
%<pret%>
%<perf%>

! Tags for other POSes
%<adv%>
%<conj%>
%<det%>
%<prep%>
%<num%>

A1 ! Archiphoneme for a:0 alternations
E1 ! Archiphoneme for e:0 alternations

%  ! The space char as multichar.

LEXICON Root

Nouns ;
Adjectives ;
Adverbs ;
Prepositions ;
Propernouns ;
Conjunctions ;
Verbs ;

LEXICON m1
%<n%>%<masc%>%<sg%>%<indef%>: # ;
%<n%>%<masc%>%<sg%>%<def%>:en # ;
%<n%>%<masc%>%<pl%>%<indef%>:er # ;
%<n%>%<masc%>%<pl%>%<def%>:ene # ;

LEXICON m1e
%<n%>%<masc%>%<sg%>%<indef%>: # ;
%<n%>%<masc%>%<sg%>%<def%>:n # ;
%<n%>%<masc%>%<pl%>%<indef%>:r # ;
%<n%>%<masc%>%<pl%>%<def%>:ne # ;

LEXICON f2
%<n%>%<fem%>%<sg%>%<indef%>: # ;
%<n%>%<fem%>%<sg%>%<def%>:a # ;
%<n%>%<fem%>%<pl%>%<indef%>:er # ;
%<n%>%<fem%>%<pl%>%<def%>:ene # ;

LEXICON n1
%<n%>%<neu%>%<sg%>%<indef%>: # ;
%<n%>%<neu%>%<sg%>%<def%>:et # ;
%<n%>%<neu%>%<pl%>%<indef%>: # ;
%<n%>%<neu%>%<pl%>%<def%>:ene # ;

LEXICON n1e
%<n%>%<neu%>%<sg%>%<indef%>:  # ;
%<n%>%<neu%>%<sg%>%<def%>:t   # ;
%<n%>%<neu%>%<pl%>%<indef%>:r # ;
%<n%>%<neu%>%<pl%>%<def%>:ne  # ;

LEXICON Adj-lex
%<adj%>%<masc%>%<sg%>%<indef%>: # ;
%<adj%>%<fem%>%<sg%>%<indef%>:  # ;
%<adj%>%<neu%>%<sg%>%<indef%>:t # ;
%<adj%>%<pl%>:e  # ;
%<adj%>%<def%>:e # ;

LEXICON Adj-ig-lex
%<adj%>%<masc%>%<sg%>%<indef%>: # ;
%<adj%>%<fem%>%<sg%>%<indef%>:  # ;
%<adj%>%<neu%>%<sg%>%<indef%>: # ;
%<adj%>%<pl%>:e  # ;
%<adj%>%<def%>:e # ;

LEXICON Adj-liten-lex
%<adj%>%<masc%>%<sg%>%<indef%>:liten  # ;
%<adj%>%<fem%>%<sg%>%<indef%>:lita  # ;
%<adj%>%<neu%>%<sg%>%<indef%>:lite # ;
%<adj%>%<pl%>%<indef%>:små  # ;
%<adj%>%<sg%>%<def%>:lille # ;
%<adj%>%<pl%>%<def%>:småe  # ;

LEXICON Adv-lex
%<adv%>: # ;

LEXICON Conj-lex
%<conj%>: # ;

LEXICON Prep-lex
%<prep%>: # ;

LEXICON Proper-lex
%<n%>%<prop%>: # ;

LEXICON V-e-lex
%<v%>%<inf%>:e   # ;
%<v%>%<pres%>:er # ;
%<v%>%<pret%>:te # ;
%<v%>%<perf%>:t  # ;

LEXICON V-a-lex
%<v%>%<inf%>:e   # ;
%<v%>%<pres%>:er # ;
%<v%>%<pret%>:a  # ;
%<v%>%<perf%>:a  # ;

LEXICON V-være-lex
%<v%>%<inf%>:være  # ;
%<v%>%<pres%>:er  # ;
%<v%>%<pret%>:var # ;
%<v%>%<perf%>:vært # ;

LEXICON V-vite-lex
%<v%>%<inf%>:ite    # ;
%<v%>%<pres%>:et    # ;
%<v%>%<pret%>:isste # ;
%<v%>%<perf%>:isst  # ;

LEXICON V-kunne-lex
%<v%>%<inf%>:unne   # ;
%<v%>%<pres%>:an    # ;
%<v%>%<pret%>:unne  # ;
%<v%>%<perf%>:unnet # ;

LEXICON V-ha-lex
%<v%>%<inf%>:    # ;
%<v%>%<pres%>:r  # ;
%<v%>%<pret%>:dde # ;
%<v%>%<perf%>:tt # ;

LEXICON V-se-lex
%<v%>%<inf%>:e    # ;
%<v%>%<pres%>:er  # ;
%<v%>%<pret%>:å   # ;
%<v%>%<perf%>:ett # ;

LEXICON V-gå-lex
%<v%>%<inf%>:å    # ;
%<v%>%<pres%>:år  # ;
%<v%>%<pret%>:ikk # ;
%<v%>%<perf%>:ått # ;

LEXICON V-ta-lex
%<v%>%<inf%>:a     # ;
%<v%>%<pres%>:ar   # ;
%<v%>%<pret%>:ok   # ;
%<v%>%<perf%>:att  # ;

LEXICON V-drikke-lex
%<v%>%<inf%>:ikke   # ;
%<v%>%<pres%>:ikker # ;
%<v%>%<pret%>:akk   # ;
%<v%>%<perf%>:ukket # ;

LEXICON Nouns

hund             m1  "house"     ;
hus              n1  "house"     ;
hage             m1e "garden"    ;
tre              n1  "tree"      ;
svar             n1  "answer"    ;
år               n1  "year"      ;
mamma            m1  "mother"    ;
katt             m1  "cat"       ;
veg              m1  "way, road" ;
jente:jent       f2  "girl"      ;
dag              m1  "day"       ;
vær              n1 "weather"    ;
!fönster:fönstE1r N2 "window"    ;
!syster:systE1r   N1 "sister"    ;
stol             m1  "chair"     ;
lyd              m1  "sound"     ;
bord             n1  "table"     ;
barn             n1  "child"     ;
dyr              n1  "animal"    ;
hode             n1e "head"      ;
folk             n1  "people"    ;
gutt             m1  "boy"       ;

LEXICON Adverbs

ikke     Adv-lex ;
også     Adv-lex ;
når      Adv-lex ;
selv% om Adv-lex ;
da       Adv-lex ;
der      Adv-lex ;
nå       Adv-lex ;
aldri    Adv-lex ;
alltid   Adv-lex ;
selv% om Adv-lex ;
utendørs Adv-lex ;
siden    Adv-lex ;
i% går   Adv-lex ;
i% dag   Adv-lex ;
igjen    Adv-lex ;
så       Adv-lex ;
sakte    Adv-lex ;
fortsatt Adv-lex ;
troligvis   Adv-lex ;
i% sammen   Adv-lex ;
naturligvis Adv-lex ;

LEXICON Adjectives

veldig         Adj-ig-lex ;
tydelig        Adj-ig-lex ;
kald           Adj-lex ;
varm           Adj-lex ;
vakker:vakkE1r Adj-lex ;
glad:glad      Adj-lex ;
gammel:gammE1l Adj-lex ;
stor           Adj-lex ;
rask           Adj-lex ;
liten:         Adj-liten-lex ;

LEXICON Conjunctions

og    Conj-lex ;
men   Conj-lex ;
at    Conj-lex ;
eller Conj-lex ;

LEXICON Prepositions
i       Prep-lex ;
på      Prep-lex ;
over    Prep-lex ;
under   Prep-lex ;
for     Prep-lex ;
ut      Prep-lex ;
til     Prep-lex ;
med     Prep-lex ;
framfor Prep-lex ;
bakom   Prep-lex ;
om      Prep-lex ;
å       Prep-lex ;
gjennom Prep-lex ;
etter   Prep-lex ;
fra     Prep-lex ;
inni    Prep-lex ;
inne% i Prep-lex ;

LEXICON Propernouns
Mary  Proper-lex ;
James Proper-lex ;

LEXICON Verbs
! Irregular and strond verbs:
   være:       V-være-lex ;
   vite:v      V-vite-lex ;
  kunne:k      V-kunne-lex ;
 drikke:dr     V-drikke-lex ;
     ha        V-ha-lex ;
     se:s      V-se-lex ;
     gå:g      V-gå-lex ;
     få:f      V-gå-lex ;
     ta:t      V-ta-lex ;

!le
!finne
!fortelle
!spørre

! Regular verbs:
    tenke:tenk     V-e-lex ;
     leke:lek      V-a-lex ;
    svare:svar     V-a-lex ;
     lete:let      V-a-lex ;
    titte:titt     V-a-lex ;
    regne:regn     V-a-lex ;
    prate:prat     V-a-lex ;
    elske:elsk     V-a-lex ;
   slutte:slutt    V-a-lex ;
    spise:spis     V-e-lex ;
   snakke:snakk    V-a-lex ;
     tale:tal      V-e-lex ;
     like:lik      V-e-lex ;
undersøke:undersøk V-e-lex ;
    lytte:lytt     V-a-lex ;
